Utah statutes.
73-23-3 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Duties and powers of Division of Water Resources.

For purposes of this chapter, the Division of Water Resources:

(1)  shall provide for the construction, operation, and maintenance of the West Desert Pumping Project;

(2)  may enter into agreements as necessary to provide for all or any portion of the West Desert Pumping Project, including any indemnification agreements required by the federal government;

(3)  may acquire land or any other property right by any lawful means, including eminent domain;

(4)  is exempt from Title 63G, Chapter 6, the Utah Procurement Code; and

(5)  may proceed without obtaining water right approval from the state engineer.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

